Missouri, session 2026, SB1126.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 37, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 37.990, to read as
follows:
37.990. 1. The commissioner of administration shall
annually compile a report of all real properties and leases
in which the state has some interest that have been
abandoned or have not been utilized, in whole or in part,
for the most recent three year period. The commissioner
shall send the initial report to each member of the general
assembly by October 1, 2026, and by every October first
thereafter. Such report shall describe each specific parcel
of state property that has been abandoned or not utilized
for the three year period and describe the previous use of
the property before the property was abandoned or not
utilized. The conveyance of property owned or utilized by
the Missouri highways and transportation commission shall be
subject to the provisions of section 227.290.
2. The governor is hereby authorized and empowered to
sell, transfer, grant, convey, remise, release, and forever
quitclaim all of interest of the state of Missouri in any
real property or lease identified in the report compiled
under subsection 1 of this section. The commissioner of
administration shall set the terms and conditions for the
conveyance of any such real property or lease as the
1

commissioner deems reasonable. Such terms and conditions
may include, but not be limited to, the number of appraisals
required and the time, place, and terms of the conveyance.
The attorney general shall approve the form of the
instrument of any such conveyance.
2